North Carolina, session 2025, HB578.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-376.5 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-376.5. School-based mental health plan required.
…
(b) School-Based Mental Health Policy. – The State Board of Education shall adopt a
school-based mental health policy that includes (i) minimum requirements for a school-based
mental health plan for K-12 school units and (ii) a model mental health training program program,
a suicide prevention education requirement, and model suicide risk referral protocol for K-12
school units. Consistent with this section, the model mental health training program program, a
suicide prevention education requirement, and model suicide risk referral protocol shall meet all
of the following requirements:
(1) The model mental health training program shall be provided to school
personnel who work with students in grades kindergarten through 12 and
address the following topics:
a. Youth mental health.
b. Suicide prevention.
c. Substance abuse.
d. Sexual abuse prevention.
e. Sex trafficking prevention.
f. Teenage dating violence.
(2) The model suicide risk referral protocol shall be provided to school personnel
who work with students in grades six through 12 and provide both of the
following:
a. Guidelines on the identification of students at risk of suicide.
b. Procedures and referral sources that address actions that should be
taken to address students identified in accordance with this
subdivision.
(3) Suicide prevention education shall be provided to all licensed educators. The
material will cover the educator's role in youth suicide awareness in more
detail than the model mental health training. This training may be
accomplished through self-review of suitable suicide prevention materials
approved by the State Board of Education. The State Board of Education and
*H578-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the Department of Public Instruction shall make suicide prevention education
materials available at no cost to K-12 school units.
(c) School-Based Mental Health Plan. – Each K-12 school unit shall adopt a plan for
promoting student mental health and well-being that includes, at a minimum, the following:
(1) Minimum requirements for a school-based mental health plan established by
the State Board of Education pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
(2) A mental health training program program, a suicide prevention education
requirement, and a suicide risk referral protocol that are consistent with the
model programs developed by the State Board of Education pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section.
(d) Training and Protocol Requirements. – Each K-12 school unit shall provide its
adopted mental health training program program, suicide prevention education, and suicide risk
referral protocol to school personnel at no cost to the employee. Employees shall receive an initial
mental health training of at least six hours and subsequent mental health trainings of at least two
hours. The initial mental health training shall occur within the first six months of employment.
Subsequent mental health trainings shall occur in the following school year and annually
thereafter. Additionally, school personnel shall complete one hour of suicide prevention
education each year to coincide with subsequent mental health trainings. In the discretion of the
K-12 school unit, the initial mental health training may be waived in the event the employee
completed an initial mental health training at another K-12 school unit. School personnel may
meet mental health training and suicide prevention education requirements in any of the
following ways:
(1) Electronic delivery of instruction.
(2) Videoconferencing.
(3) Group, in-person training.
(4) Self-study.
(5) Completion of approved programs.
(e) Review and Update. – Beginning August 1, 2025, and every five years thereafter, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction shall review the State Board of Education's minimum
requirements for a school-based mental health plan, model mental health training program,
suicide prevention education, and model suicide risk referral protocol and recommend any
needed changes to the State Board of Education. The State Board shall update its policies to
reflect those recommendations and publish the updates to K-12 school units. A K-12 school unit
shall update its adopted school-based mental health plan in accordance with any updates provided
by the State Board.
(f) Reporting; State Audit. – By September 15 of each year, each K-12 school unit shall
report to the Department of Public Instruction on (i) the content of the school-based mental health
plan adopted in the unit, including the mental health training program program, the suicide
prevention education requirement, and suicide risk referral protocol, and (ii) prior school year
compliance with requirements of this section. The Department of Public Instruction may also
audit K-12 school units at appropriate times to ensure compliance with the requirements of this
section. The Department shall report the information it receives pursuant to this subsection to the
Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on Health and Human Services by December 15 of each year.
…
(h) Limitation of Civil Liability. – No governing body of a K-12 school unit, nor its
members, employees, designees, agents, or volunteers, shall be liable in civil damages to any
party for any loss or damage caused by any act or omission relating to the provision of,
participation in, or implementation of any component of a school-based mental health plan,
mental health training program, a suicide prevention education requirement, or suicide risk
referral protocol required by this section, unless that act or omission amounts to gross negligence,
Page 2 House Bill 578-Second Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
wanton conduct, or intentional wrongdoing. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose
any specific duty of care or standard of care on a K-12 school unit."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-150.12C(16) reads as rewritten:
"(16) School-based mental health. – The board of trustees shall adopt a school-based
mental health plan, including a mental health training program program, a
suicide prevention education requirement, and suicide risk referral protocol,
in accordance with G.S. 115C-376.5."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 115C-218.75(h) reads as rewritten:
"(h) School-Based Mental Health Plan Required. – A charter school shall adopt a
school-based mental health plan, including a mental health training program program, a suicide
prevention education requirement, and suicide risk referral protocol, in accordance with
G.S. 115C-376.5."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 115C-238.66(16) reads as rewritten:
"(16) School-based mental health plan required. – A regional school shall adopt a
school-based mental health plan, including a mental health training program
program, a suicide prevention education requirement, and suicide risk referral
protocol, in accordance with G.S. 115C-376.5."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 116-239.8(b)(18) reads as rewritten:
"(18) School-based mental health plan required. – A laboratory school shall adopt a
school-based mental health plan, including a mental health training program
program, a suicide prevention education requirement, and suicide risk referral
protocol, in accordance with G.S. 115C-376.5."
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
House Bill 578-Second Edition Page 3